Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2047.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Local News Fellowship Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Administering institution." An institution designated by the Governor within the State System of Higher Education that is reasonably qualified to administer the program or the State Library of Pennsylvania."Civic information needs." The information resources, including local journalism and communication infrastructure, 123456789101112131415161718 needed by a community for civic engagement and participation."Community-based newsroom." A nonprofit or independent media organization that meets all of the following criteria:(1) Maintains its principal place of business within this Commonwealth.(2) Primarily serves a local or regional audience.(3) Produces original reporting that advances civic engagement, public accountability or community-informed journalism."Fellow." An early-career journalist who is selected to participate in the program under section 4(a)."Host newsroom." A community-based newsroom that applies for and receives approval from the administering institution to host a fellow under the program."Program." The Local News Fellowship Program established under section 3(a).Section 3. Establishment of program.(a) Establishment.--The Local News Fellowship Program is established within the administering institution to expand access to high-quality local journalism, support the development of early-career and mid-career journalists and strengthen the capacity of community-based newsrooms throughout this Commonwealth SUBJECT TO THE AVAILABILITY OF MONEY APPROPRIATED FOR THIS PURPOSE. Within 90 days of the effective date of this subsection, the Governor shall designate the administering institution and transmit notice of the designation to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(b) Program components.--The TO THE EXTENT MONEY IS AVAILABLE, THE program shall include the following core 20250HB2047PN2874 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 components:(1) The administering institution shall assign fellows to host newsrooms in accordance with the selection process under section 4.(2) Fellows shall receive fair compensation, mentorship and access to training opportunities to enhance their journalistic skills and community engagement.(3) Priority shall be given to placements that serve communities with significant civic information needs, including rural areas, communities of color and immigrant populations.(4) The program shall encourage fellows to build lasting ties to the host newsroom and the community served.Section 4. Selection and placement of fellows.(a) Selection of fellows.--The administering institution shall establish a competitive selection process for fellows, which may include criteria such as academic or professional background, demonstrated commitment to public-interest journalism and alignment with the goals of the program.(b) Approval of host newsrooms.--The administering institution shall develop and post criteria for the designation of host newsrooms on the administering institution's publicly accessible Internet website. The criteria shall include all of the following:(1) The newsroom's capacity to provide editorial oversight, mentorship and professional development.(2) The newsroom's alignment with the goals of the program.(3) The demonstrated civic information needs of the community served.20250HB2047PN2874 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Placement guidelines.--In making fellowship placements, the administering institution shall seek geographic and demographic diversity and shall prioritize underserved communities with limited access to original local news and civic information needs.Section 5. Administration of program.(a) Administration.--The administering institution shall administer the program ONLY TO THE EXTENT MONEY IS AVAILABLE and may partner or contract with a nonprofit organization that has experience in journalism education, civic media or public-interest reporting to implement all or part of the program.(b) Duties.--The administering institution or a nonprofit organization engaged under subsection (a) shall have the following duties:(1) Manage outreach and application processes for fellows and host newsrooms.(2) Coordinate fellow placement and provide or facilitate training, mentorship and cohort-building activities.(3) Monitor the performance of fellows and host newsrooms throughout the duration of the fellowship.(c) Reporting requirements.--(1) The administering institution shall prepare an annual report evaluating the implementation and outcomes of the program. The report shall include all of the following information:(i) The number of fellows placed and the names and locations of approved host newsrooms.(ii) A summary of training, mentorship and community engagement activities.20250HB2047PN2874 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) An assessment of the program's impact on access to civic information needs in participating communities.(iv) Fellow retention and post-fellowship employment outcomes in this Commonwealth.(v) Demographic representation of the applicant pool, selected fellows and host newsrooms, reported in aggregate form.(vi) A description of methods used to measure the program's impact on civic information needs and the results of those measures.(vii) A summary of public feedback received under paragraph (3) and the administering institution's response, including any program changes adopted.(viii) Any recommendations for improvement or expansion of the program.(2) The administering institution shall submit the annual report to the Governor and the General Assembly and post the report on its publicly accessible Internet website.(3) The administering institution shall maintain a publicly accessible mechanism to receive comments from fellows, host newsrooms and members of the public regarding the program and shall solicit comments not less than annually for inclusion in the report under paragraph (1).Section 6. Editorial independence.(a) Noninterference.--Each fellow and host newsroom shall retain sole editorial control over content, assignments and publication decisions. Neither the administering institution, the Commonwealth nor any officer or employee thereof may direct, control or otherwise influence the editorial decision making of 20250HB2047PN2874 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 fellows or host newsrooms.(b) Viewpoint neutrality.--Program funds or participation may not be conditioned on the viewpoint, content or subject of reporting.(c) Administrative decisions.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit administrative decisions on eligibility, placement or funding that are made under neutral program criteria.SECTION 7. ADMINISTRATION.THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY APPROPRIATE FUNDING AS IT DEEMS NECESSARY TO EFFECTUATE THE PROVISIONS OF THIS ACT.Section 7 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2047PN2874 - 6 - <--<--12345678910111213